Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-3002
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Nebraska Career Scholarship Act:

(1) Community college means a public postsecondary educational institution which is part of the community college system and includes all branches and campuses of such institution located within the State of Nebraska;

(2) First-time freshman means a student who enrolled in an eligible program of study, who has not previously been enrolled in a postsecondary institution within three years immediately preceding the application for a scholarship pursuant to the act, and who has not previously earned a postsecondary credential except as a dual-credit or early-college high school student;

(3) Nebraska Career Scholarship means a scholarship awarded under the act or a scholarship awarded as a Nebraska Career Scholarship pursuant to Laws 2021, LB380, or Laws 2020, LB1008;

(4) Nonscholarship student means a student who has never been awarded a Nebraska Career Scholarship for the applicable eligible program of study;

(5) Private college means an accredited private nonprofit institution of postsecondary education located within the State of Nebraska;

(6) Scholarship recipient means a student who has been awarded a Nebraska Career Scholarship;

(7) Standard college admission test means the national assessment instrument that is also used as the standard college admission test selected by the State Board of Education and administered to students in the eleventh grade pursuant to subsection (9) of section 79-760.03; and

(8) Transfer student means a student who has not previously earned a postsecondary credential and who has transferred into an eligible program of study (a) from another postsecondary institution or (b) from another program of study within the same postsecondary institution. A student that previously earned a postsecondary credential, but only as a dual-credit or early-college high school student, shall be considered a transfer student if such student transferred into an eligible program of study from another postsecondary institution or a program within the same postsecondary institution directly following such student's early-college high school enrollment.

Laws 2022, LB902, § 2;

Laws 2024, LB1329, § 96.